src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-papp_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - papp â-stem : # Noun 'priest/pappi' - full paradigm
     papp+N+Sg+Nom: papp
     papp+N+Sg+Gen: paapp
     papp+N+Sg+Acc: paapp
     papp+N+Sg+Ill: paʹppe
     papp+N+Sg+Loc: paappâst
     papp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: papstes
     papp+N+Sg+Com: paappin
     papp+N+Ess: pappân
     papp+N+Par: pappâd
     papp+N+Sg+Abe: [paapptaa, paapptää]
     papp+N+Pl+Nom: paapp
     papp+N+Pl+Gen: paappi
     papp+N+Pl+Acc: paappid
     papp+N+Pl+Ill: paappid
     papp+N+Pl+Loc: paappin
     papp+N+Pl+Com: paappivuiʹm
     papp+N+Pl+Abe: [paappitaa, paappitää]
     papp+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: paappâž
